District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.05

Rules.

(a)

(1)

Except as provided in § 2-219.03(e)(1B) and (1C), within 180 days of February 24, 2012, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of this title [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the Workforce Act.

(2)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

Any subsequent rules issued by the Mayor to implement the provisions of this part shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review in accordance with subsection (a)(2) of this section.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-93, § 6, 31 DCR 2545
Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-84, § 2(f), 58 DCR 11170
1981 Ed., § 1-1165.
D.C. Law 19-84 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“The Mayor shall issue rules to carry out the purposes of this part not later than 60 days after June 29, 1984.”
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-93, see Mayor’s Order 86-66, April 22, 1986.